Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB805.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 600.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 600 to 645, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Abused or neglected child" means a child whose health or welfare is harmed or
threatened with harm when:
(a) His or her parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust,
as defined in KRS 532.045, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child:
1. Inflicts or allows to be inflicted upon the child physical or emotional
injury as defined in this section by other than accidental means;
2. Creates or allows to be created a risk of physical or emotional injury as
defined in this section to the child by other than accidental means;
3. Engages in a pattern of conduct that renders the parent incapable of
caring for the immediate and ongoing needs of the child, including but
not limited to parental incapacity due to a substance use disorder as
defined in KRS 222.005;
4. Continuously or repeatedly fails or refuses to provide essential parental
care and protection for the child, considering the age of the child;
5. Commits or allows to be committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution upon the child;
6. Creates or allows to be created a risk that an act of sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, or prostitution will be committed upon the child;
7. Abandons or exploits the child;
8. Does not provide the child with adequate care, supervision, food,
clothing, shelter, and education or medical care necessary for the child's
well-being when financially able to do so or offered financial or other
Page 1 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
means to do so. A parent or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child legitimately practicing the person's religious
beliefs shall not be considered a negligent parent solely because of
failure to provide specified medical treatment for a child for that reason
alone. This exception shall not preclude a court from ordering necessary
medical services for a child;
9. Fails to make sufficient progress toward identified goals as set forth in
the court-approved case plan to allow for the safe return of the child to
the parent that results in the child remaining committed to the cabinet
and remaining in foster care for fifteen (15) cumulative months out of
forty-eight (48) months; or
10. Commits or allows female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125
to be committed; or
(b) A person twenty-one (21) years of age or older commits or allows to be
committed an act of sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or prostitution upon a
child less than sixteen (16) years of age;
(2) "Age or developmentally appropriate" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. sec.
675(11);
(3) "Aggravated circumstances" means the existence of one (1) or more of the
following conditions:
(a) The parent has not attempted or has not had contact with the child for a period
of not less than ninety (90) days;
(b) The parent is incarcerated and will be unavailable to care for the child for a
period of at least one (1) year from the date of the child's entry into foster care
and there is no appropriate relative placement available during this period of
time;
(c) The parent has sexually abused the child and has refused available treatment;
Page 2 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(d) The parent has been found by the cabinet to have engaged in abuse of the
child that required removal from the parent's home two (2) or more times in
the past two (2) years; or
(e) The parent has caused the child serious physical injury;
(4) "Beyond the control of parents" means a child who has repeatedly failed to follow
the reasonable directives of his or her parents, legal guardian, or person exercising
custodial control or supervision other than a state agency, which behavior results in
danger to the child or others, and which behavior does not constitute behavior that
would warrant the filing of a petition under KRS Chapter 645;
(5) "Beyond the control of school" means any child who has been found by the court to
have repeatedly violated the lawful regulations for the government of the school as
provided in KRS 158.150, and as documented in writing by the school as a part of
the school's petition or as an attachment to the school's petition. The petition or
attachment shall describe the student's behavior and all intervention strategies
attempted by the school;
(6) "Boarding home" means a privately owned and operated home for the boarding and
lodging of individuals which is approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice or
the cabinet for the placement of children committed to the department or the
cabinet;
(7) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(8) "Certified juvenile facility staff" means individuals who meet the qualifications of,
and who have completed a course of education and training in juvenile detention
developed and approved by, the Department of Juvenile Justice after consultation
with other appropriate state agencies;
(9) "Child" means any person who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday,
unless otherwise provided;
(10) "Child-caring facility" means any facility or group home other than a state facility,
Page 3 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
Department of Juvenile Justice contract facility or group home, or one certified by
an appropriate agency as operated primarily for educational or medical purposes,
providing residential care on a twenty-four (24) hour basis to children not related by
blood, adoption, or marriage to the person maintaining the facility;
(11) "Child-placing agency" means any agency, other than a state agency, which
supervises the placement of children in foster family homes or child-caring
facilities or which places children for adoption;
(12) "Clinical treatment facility" means a facility with more than eight (8) beds
designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the treatment of
mentally ill children. The treatment program of such facilities shall be supervised
by a qualified mental health professional;
(13) "Commitment" means an order of the court which places a child under the custodial
control or supervision of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department
of Juvenile Justice, or another facility or agency until the child attains the age of
eighteen (18) unless otherwise provided by law;
(14) "Community-based facility" means any nonsecure, homelike facility licensed,
operated, or permitted to operate by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the
cabinet, which is located within a reasonable proximity of the child's family and
home community, which affords the child the opportunity, if a Kentucky resident,
to continue family and community contact;
(15) "Complaint" means a verified statement setting forth allegations in regard to the
child which contain sufficient facts for the formulation of a subsequent petition;
(16) "Court" means the juvenile session of District Court unless a statute specifies the
adult session of District Court or the Circuit Court;
(17) "Court-designated worker" means that organization or individual delegated by the
Administrative Office of the Courts for the purposes of placing children in
alternative placements prior to arraignment, conducting preliminary investigations,
Page 4 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
and formulating, entering into, and supervising diversion agreements and
performing such other functions as authorized by law or court order;
(18) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as it does in KRS 500.080;
(19) "Department" means the Department for Community Based Services;
(20) "Dependent child" means any child, other than an abused or neglected child, who is
under improper care, custody, control, or guardianship that is not due to an
intentional act of the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision of the child;
(21) "Detention" means the safe and temporary custody of a juvenile who is accused of
conduct subject to the jurisdiction of the court who requires a restricted or closely
supervised environment for his or her own or the community's protection;
(22) "Detention hearing" means a hearing held by a judge or trial commissioner within
twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the start of any
period of detention prior to adjudication;
(23) "Diversion agreement" means a mechanism designed to hold a child accountable
for his or her behavior and, if appropriate, securing services to serve the best
interest of the child and to provide redress for that behavior without court action
and without the creation of a formal court record;
(24) "Eligible youth" means a person who:
(a) Is or has been committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused;
(b) Is eighteen (18) years of age to nineteen (19) years of age; and
(c) Is requesting to extend or reinstate his or her commitment to the cabinet in
order to participate in state or federal educational programs or to establish
independent living arrangements;
(25) "Emergency shelter" is a group home, private residence, foster home, or similar
homelike facility which provides temporary or emergency care of children and
adequate staff and services consistent with the needs of each child;
Page 5 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(26) "Emotional injury" means an injury to the mental or psychological capacity or
emotional stability of a child as evidenced by a substantial and observable
impairment in the child's ability to function within a normal range of performance
and behavior with due regard to his or her age, development, culture, and
environment as testified to by a qualified mental health professional;
(27) "Evidence-based practices" means policies, procedures, programs, and practices
proven by scientific research to reliably produce reductions in recidivism;
(28) "Fictive kin" means an individual who is not related by birth, adoption, or marriage
to a child, but who has an emotionally significant relationship with the child, or an
emotionally significant relationship with a biological parent, siblings, or half-
siblings of the child in the case of a child from birth to twelve (12) months of age,
prior to placement;
(29) "Firearm" shall have the same meaning as in KRS 237.060 and 527.010;
(30) "Foster family home" means a private home in which children are placed for foster
family care under supervision of the cabinet or a licensed child-placing agency;
(31) "Graduated sanction" means any of a continuum of accountability measures,
programs, and sanctions, ranging from less restrictive to more restrictive in nature,
that may include but are not limited to:
(a) Electronic monitoring;
(b) Drug and alcohol screening, testing, or monitoring;
(c) Day or evening reporting centers;
(d) Reporting requirements;
(e) Community service; and
(f) Rehabilitative interventions such as family counseling, substance abuse
treatment, restorative justice programs, and behavioral or mental health
treatment;
(32) "Habitual runaway" means any child who has been found by the court to have been
Page 6 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
absent from his or her place of lawful residence without the permission of his or her
custodian for at least three (3) days during a one (1) year period;
(33) "Habitual truant" means any child who has been found by the court to have been
reported as a truant as defined in KRS 159.150(1) two (2) or more times during a
one (1) year period;
(34) "Hospital" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, a licensed private or
public facility, health care facility, or part thereof, which is approved by the cabinet
to treat children;
(35) "Independent living" means those activities necessary to assist a committed child to
establish independent living arrangements;
(36) "Informal adjustment" means an agreement reached among the parties, with
consultation, but not the consent, of the victim of the crime or other persons
specified in KRS 610.070 if the victim chooses not to or is unable to participate,
after a petition has been filed, which is approved by the court, that the best interest
of the child would be served without formal adjudication and disposition;
(37) "Intentionally" means, with respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute
which defines an offense, that the actor's conscious objective is to cause that result
or to engage in that conduct;
(38) "Least restrictive alternative" means, except for purposes of KRS Chapter 645, that
the program developed on the child's behalf is no more harsh, hazardous, or
intrusive than necessary; or involves no restrictions on physical movements nor
requirements for residential care except as reasonably necessary for the protection
of the child from physical injury; or protection of the community, and is conducted
at the suitable available facility closest to the child's place of residence to allow for
appropriate family engagement;
(39) "Motor vehicle offense" means any violation of the nonfelony provisions of KRS
Chapters 186, 189, or 189A, KRS 177.300, 304.39-110, or 304.39-117;
Page 7 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(40) "Near fatality" means an injury that, as certified by a physician, places a child in
serious or critical condition;
(41) "Needs of the child" means necessary food, clothing, health, shelter, and education;
(42) "Nonoffender" means a child alleged to be dependent, neglected, or abused and
who has not been otherwise charged with a status or public offense;
(43) "Nonsecure facility" means a facility which provides its residents access to the
surrounding community and which does not rely primarily on the use of physically
restricting construction and hardware to restrict freedom;
(44) "Nonsecure setting" means a nonsecure facility or a residential home, including a
child's own home, where a child may be temporarily placed pending further court
action. Children before the court in a county that is served by a state operated
secure detention facility, who are in the detention custody of the Department of
Juvenile Justice, and who are placed in a nonsecure alternative by the Department
of Juvenile Justice, shall be supervised by the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(45) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement other than in the home of a parent,
relative, or guardian, in a boarding home, clinical treatment facility, community-
based facility, detention facility, emergency shelter, fictive kin home, foster family
home, hospital, nonsecure facility, physically secure facility, residential treatment
facility, or youth alternative center;
(46) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive mother or father of a child;
(47) "Person exercising custodial control or supervision" means a person or agency that
has assumed the role and responsibility of a parent or guardian for the child, but that
does not necessarily have legal custody of the child;
(48) "Petition" means a verified statement, setting forth allegations in regard to the child,
which initiates formal court involvement in the child's case;
(49) "Physical injury" means substantial physical pain or any impairment of physical
condition;
Page 8 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(50) "Physically secure facility" means a facility that relies primarily on the use of
construction and hardware such as locks, bars, and fences to restrict freedom;
(51) "Public offense action" means an action, excluding contempt, brought in the interest
of a child who is accused of committing an offense under KRS Chapter 527 or a
public offense which, if committed by an adult, would be a crime, whether the same
is a felony, misdemeanor, or violation, other than an action alleging that a child
sixteen (16) years of age or older has committed a motor vehicle offense;
(52) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A physician licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the performance of official duties;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under the laws of Kentucky to practice medicine or
osteopathy, or a medical officer of the government of the United States while
engaged in the practice of official duties, and who is certified or eligible to
apply for certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology,
Inc.;
(c) A psychologist with the health service provider designation, a psychological
practitioner, a certified psychologist, or a psychological associate licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A licensed registered nurse with a master's degree in psychiatric nursing from
an accredited institution and two (2) years of clinical experience with
mentally ill persons, or a licensed registered nurse with a bachelor's degree in
nursing from an accredited institution who is certified as a psychiatric and
mental health nurse by the American Nurses Association and who has three
(3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in psychiatric nursing
and who is currently employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a
Page 9 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
private agency or company engaged in providing mental health services, or a
regional comprehensive care center;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100, or a certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric social work and currently employed by a hospital or forensic
psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.300 to 335.399 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical
experience in psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a
hospital or forensic psychiatric facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a
psychiatric unit of a general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in
providing mental health services, or a regional comprehensive care center;
(g) A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS 335.500 to
335.599 with three (3) years of inpatient or outpatient clinical experience in
psychiatric mental health practice and currently employed by a hospital or
forensic facility licensed by the Commonwealth, a psychiatric unit of a
general hospital, a private agency or company engaged in providing mental
health services, or a regional comprehensive care center; or
(h) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862, who meets one
(1) of the following requirements:
1. Provides documentation that he or she has completed a psychiatric
residency program for physician assistants;
2. Has completed at least one thousand (1,000) hours of clinical experience
under a supervising physician, as defined by KRS 311.840, who is a
Page 10 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
psychiatrist and is certified or eligible for certification by the American
Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
3. Holds a master's degree from a physician assistant program accredited
by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the
Physician Assistant or its predecessor or successor agencies, is
practicing under a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840,
and:
a. Has two (2) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least two (2) years; or
4. Holds a bachelor's degree, possesses a current physician assistant
certificate issued by the board prior to July 15, 2002, is practicing under
a supervising physician as defined by KRS 311.840, and:
a. Has three (3) years of clinical experience in the assessment,
evaluation, and treatment of mental disorders; or
b. Has been employed by a hospital or forensic psychiatric facility
licensed by the Commonwealth or a psychiatric unit of a general
hospital or a private agency or company engaged in the provision
of mental health services or a regional community program for
mental health and individuals with an intellectual disability for at
least three (3) years;
(53) "Reasonable and prudent parent standard" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C.
Page 11 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
sec. 675(10);
(54) "Residential treatment facility" means a facility or group home with more than eight
(8) beds designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the
treatment of children;
(55) "Retain in custody" means, after a child has been taken into custody, the continued
holding of the child by a peace officer for a period of time not to exceed twelve (12)
hours when authorized by the court or the court-designated worker for the purpose
of making preliminary inquiries;
(56) "Risk and needs assessment" means an actuarial tool scientifically proven to
identify specific factors and needs that are related to delinquent and noncriminal
misconduct;
(57) "Safety plan" means a written agreement developed by the cabinet and agreed to by
a family that clearly describes the protective services that the cabinet will provide
the family in order to manage risks[threats] to a child's safety;
(58) "School personnel" means those certified persons under the supervision of the local
public or private education agency;
(59) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(60) "Secure juvenile detention facility" means any physically secure facility used for
the secure detention of children other than any facility in which adult prisoners are
confined;
(61) "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a substantial risk of
death or which causes serious and prolonged disfigurement, prolonged impairment
of health, or prolonged loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or
organ;
(62) "Sexual abuse" includes but is not necessarily limited to any contacts or interactions
in which the parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as
defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision of
Page 12 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
the child or responsibility for his or her welfare, uses or allows, permits, or
encourages the use of the child for the purposes of the sexual stimulation of the
perpetrator or another person;
(63) "Sexual exploitation" includes but is not limited to a situation in which a parent,
guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as defined in KRS
532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision of a child or
responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the child to
engage in an act which constitutes prostitution under Kentucky law; or a parent,
guardian, person in a position of authority or special trust, as defined in KRS
532.045, or other person having custodial control or supervision of a child or
responsible for his or her welfare, allows, permits, or encourages the child to
engage in an act of obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of
a child as provided for under Kentucky law;
(64) "Social service worker" means any employee of the cabinet or any private agency
designated as such by the secretary of the cabinet or a social worker employed by a
county or city who has been approved by the cabinet to provide, under its
supervision, services to families and children;
(65) "Staff secure facility for residential treatment" means any setting which assures that
all entrances and exits are under the exclusive control of the facility staff, and in
which a child may reside for the purpose of receiving treatment;
(66) "Statewide reporting system" means a system for making and compiling reports of
child dependency, neglect, and abuse in Kentucky made via telephone call or in
writing by a member of the public;
(67) (a) "Status offense action" is any action brought in the interest of a child who is
accused of committing acts, which if committed by an adult, would not be a
crime. Such behavior shall not be considered criminal or delinquent and such
children shall be termed status offenders. Status offenses shall include:
Page 13 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
1. Beyond the control of school or beyond the control of parents;
2. Habitual runaway;
3. Habitual truant; and
4. Alcohol offenses as provided in KRS 244.085.
(b) Status offenses shall not include violations of state or local ordinances which
may apply to children such as a violation of curfew;
(68) "Take into custody" means the procedure by which a peace officer or other
authorized person initially assumes custody of a child. A child may be taken into
custody for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours;
(69) "Transitional living support" means all benefits to which an eligible youth is
entitled upon being granted extended or reinstated commitment to the cabinet by the
court;
(70) "Transition plan" means a plan that is personalized at the direction of the youth that:
(a) Includes specific options on housing, health insurance, education, local
opportunities for mentors and continuing support services, and workforce
supports and employment services; and
(b) Is as detailed as the youth may elect;
(71) "Valid court order" means a court order issued by a judge to a child alleged or
found to be a status offender:
(a) Who was brought before the court and made subject to the order;
(b) Whose future conduct was regulated by the order;
(c) Who was given written and verbal warning of the consequences of the
violation of the order at the time the order was issued and whose attorney or
parent or legal guardian was also provided with a written notice of the
consequences of violation of the order, which notification is reflected in the
record of the court proceedings; and
(d) Who received, before the issuance of the order, the full due process rights
Page 14 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States;
(72) "Violation" means any offense, other than a traffic infraction, for which a sentence
of a fine only can be imposed;
(73) "Youth alternative center" means a nonsecure facility, approved by the Department
of Juvenile Justice, for the detention of juveniles, both prior to adjudication and
after adjudication, which meets the criteria specified in KRS 15A.320; and
(74) "Youthful offender" means any person regardless of age, transferred to Circuit
Court under the provisions of KRS Chapter 635 or 640 and who is subsequently
convicted in Circuit Court.
Section 2. KRS 620.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 2021, the cabinet shall submit to the
Legislative Research Commission a comprehensive report that does not identify
individuals, detailing the number of reports the cabinet has received regarding
female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125, the number of reports in
which the cabinet has investigated and determined that a child is the victim of
female genital mutilation, and the number of cases in which services were provided.
(2) Beginning August 1, 2024, and monthly thereafter, the cabinet shall make available
on its website and deliver to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee, Senate Standing Committee, and House Standing
Committee on Families and Children, a report on the monthly child protective
services intakes received by the cabinet. The monthly report shall include at a
minimum the following:
(a) Total number of all reports[intakes];
(b) All child protective services response reports[intakes];
(c) Reports[Intakes] with allegations of:
1. Abuse; and
2. Neglect;
Page 15 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(d) Reports that met acceptance criteria;
(e) Reports with a substantiated or services needed finding; and
(f) Reports with a substantiated finding.
Section 3. KRS 620.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon receipt of a report alleging abuse or neglect of a child as defined in KRS
600.020 by a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority,
person in a position of special trust, or person exercising custodial control or
supervision, pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) or (2), or a report alleging a child is
a victim of human trafficking pursuant to KRS 620.030(3), the recipient of the
report shall immediately notify the cabinet or its designated representative, the
local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police,
and the Commonwealth's or county attorney of the receipt of the report. If any
agency listed above is the reporting source, the recipient shall immediately
notify the cabinet or its designated representative, the local law enforcement
agency, the Department of Kentucky State Police, and the Commonwealth's
or county attorney of the receipt of the report.
(b) Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an
initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child.
Based upon the level of risk determined, the cabinet shall investigate the
allegation or accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if
appropriate, may provide or make referral to any community-based services
necessary to reduce risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of
sexual abuse or human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and
shall not be referred to any other community agency. If the:
1. Cabinet's initial determination is that there is risk of harm and
immediate safety concerns for the child, the cabinet shall physically
locate the child within fourteen (14) days of the initial determination;
Page 16 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
2. Child is under the age of five (5) years or has other developmental or
cognitive delays or a significant medical or mental health condition,
the cabinet shall physically locate the child within five (5) working
days of the initial determination; and
3. Cabinet does not physically locate the child according to the timeline
established in this paragraph, the cabinet shall contact local law
enforcement to assist in locating the child.
(c) In making the initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate
safety of the child pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet
shall at a minimum:
1. Consider the age and vulnerability of a child, particularly for ages five
(5) years of age and under, when assessing allegations of abuse and
neglect;
2. [Automatically ]Accept for investigation a subsequent report from a
professional reporting source, who makes a report pursuant to the
requirements in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is abused or neglected and
identifies himself or herself by name, title, and employer, when the same
or similar allegation has been reported by one (1) or more unique
professional reporting sources within the past thirty (30) days. For the
purposes of this subparagraph "professional reporting source" means an
individual who is a social worker, therapist, medical professional,
educator, judge, attorney, law enforcement officer, or any other
individual holding a degree or position in a field related to the safety and
care of children; and
3. Automatically accept for investigation a report from a court of
appropriate jurisdiction that makes a report pursuant to the requirements
in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is abused or neglected or identifies that
Page 17 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
the child is an alleged victim of domestic violence and abuse as defined
in KRS 403.720 or sexual assault as defined in KRS 456.010[a
plaintiff] in an active emergency protective order or temporary
interpersonal protection order case.
(d) The cabinet shall, within seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of weekends and
holidays, make a written report, including but not limited to electronic
submissions, to the Commonwealth's or county attorney and the local law
enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police concerning
the action that has been taken on the investigation.
(e) If the report alleges abuse or neglect by someone other than a parent,
guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in a position of
special trust, or person exercising custodial control or supervision, or the
human trafficking of a child, the cabinet shall immediately notify the
Commonwealth's or county attorney and the local law enforcement agency or
the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(2) (a) Upon receipt of a report alleging dependency pursuant to KRS 620.030(1) and
(2), the recipient shall immediately notify the cabinet or its designated
representative.
(b) Based upon the allegation in the report, the cabinet shall immediately make an
initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate safety of the child.
Based upon the level of risk, the cabinet shall investigate the allegation or
accept the report for an assessment of family needs and, if appropriate, may
provide or make referral to any community-based services necessary to reduce
risk to the child and to provide family support. A report of sexual abuse or
human trafficking of a child shall be considered high risk and shall not be
referred to any other community agency. If the:
1. Cabinet's initial determination is that there is risk of harm and
Page 18 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
immediate safety concerns for the child, the cabinet shall physically
locate the child within fourteen (14) days of the initial determination;
2. Child is under the age of five (5) years or has other developmental or
cognitive delays or significant medical or mental health condition, the
cabinet shall physically locate the child within five (5) working days of
the initial determination; and
3. Cabinet does not physically locate the child according to the timeline
established in this paragraph, the cabinet shall contact local law
enforcement to assist in locating the child.
(c) In making the initial determination as to the risk of harm and immediate
safety of the child pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet
shall at a minimum:
1. Consider the age and vulnerability of a child, particularly for ages five
(5) years of age and under, when assessing allegations of dependency;
2. [Automatically ]Accept for investigation a subsequent report from a
professional reporting source, who makes a report pursuant to the
requirements in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is dependent and
identifies himself or herself by name, title, and employer, when the same
or similar allegation has been reported by one (1) or more unique
professional reporting sources within the past thirty (30) days. For the
purposes of this subparagraph "professional reporting source" means an
individual who is a social worker, therapist, medical professional,
educator, judge, attorney, law enforcement officer, or any other
individual holding a degree or position in a field related to the safety and
care of children; and
3. Automatically accept for investigation a report from a court of
appropriate jurisdiction that makes a report pursuant to the requirements
Page 19 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
in KRS Chapter 620 that a child is dependent or identifies that the child
is an alleged victim of domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS
403.720 or sexual assault as defined in KRS 456.010[a plaintiff] in an
active emergency protective order or temporary interpersonal protection
order case.
(d) The cabinet need not notify the local law enforcement agency or the
Department of Kentucky State Police or Commonwealth's or county attorney
of reports made under this subsection unless the report involves the human
trafficking of a child, in which case the notification shall be required.
(3) If the cabinet or its designated representative receives a report of abuse by a person
other than a parent, guardian, fictive kin, person in a position of authority, person in
a position of special trust, or other person exercising custodial control or
supervision of a child, it shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency
or the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Commonwealth's or county
attorney of the receipt of the report and its contents, and they shall investigate the
matter. The cabinet or its designated representative shall participate in an
investigation of noncustodial physical abuse or neglect at the request of the local
law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police. The cabinet
shall participate in all investigations of reported or suspected sexual abuse or human
trafficking of a child.
(4) School personnel or other persons listed in KRS 620.030(2) do not have the
authority to conduct internal investigations in lieu of the official investigations
outlined in this section.
(5) (a) If, after receiving the report, the law enforcement officer, the cabinet, or its
designated representative cannot gain admission to the location of the child, a
search warrant shall be requested from, and may be issued by, the judge to the
appropriate law enforcement official upon probable cause that the child is
Page 20 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
dependent, neglected, or abused. If, pursuant to a search under a warrant, a
child is discovered and appears to be in imminent danger, the child may be
removed by the law enforcement officer.
(b) If a child who is in a hospital or under the immediate care of a physician
appears to be in imminent danger if he or she is returned to the persons having
custody of him or her, the physician or hospital administrator may hold the
child without court order, provided that a request is made to the court for an
emergency custody order at the earliest practicable time, not to exceed
seventy-two (72) hours.
(c) Any appropriate law enforcement officer may take a child into protective
custody and may hold that child in protective custody without the consent of
the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision if there
exist reasonable grounds for the officer to believe that the child is in danger of
imminent death or serious physical injury, is being sexually abused, or is a
victim of human trafficking and that the parents or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the child.
The officer or the person to whom the officer entrusts the child shall, within
twelve (12) hours of taking the child into protective custody, request the court
to issue an emergency custody order.
(d) When a law enforcement officer, hospital administrator, or physician takes a
child into custody without the consent of the parent or other person exercising
custodial control or supervision, he or she shall provide written notice to the
parent or other person stating the reasons for removal of the child. Failure of
the parent or other person to receive notice shall not, by itself, be cause for
civil or criminal liability.
(e) 1. If a report includes a child fatality or near fatality, and the law
enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe any parent or
Page 21 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child was under
the influence of alcohol or drugs at the time the fatality or near fatality
occurred, the law enforcement officer shall request a test of blood,
breath, or urine from that person.
2. If, after making the request, consent is not given for the test of blood,
breath, or urine, a search warrant shall be requested from and may be
issued by the judge to the appropriate law enforcement official upon
probable cause that a child fatality or near fatality has occurred and that
the person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child at the
time of the fatality or near fatality was under the influence.
3. Any test requested under this section shall be conducted pursuant to the
testing procedures and requirements in KRS 189A.103.
(6) The cabinet shall make efforts as soon as practicable to determine any military
status of a parent or legal guardian of a child who is the subject of an investigation
or assessment pursuant to this section. If the cabinet determines that the parent or
legal guardian is a member of the United States Armed Forces, the cabinet shall
notify the Department of Defense family advocacy program operating within the
service member's assigned installation of the investigation or assessment and
provide case information.
(7) To the extent practicable and when in the best interest of a child alleged to have
been abused, interviews with the child shall be conducted at a children's advocacy
center.
(8) (a) One (1) or more multidisciplinary teams may be established in every county
or group of contiguous counties.
(b) Membership of the multidisciplinary team shall include but shall not be
limited to social service workers employed by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services and law enforcement officers. Additional team members may
Page 22 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
include Commonwealth's and county attorneys, children's advocacy center
staff, mental health professionals, medical professionals, victim advocates
including advocates for victims of human trafficking, educators, and other
related professionals, as deemed appropriate.
(c) The multidisciplinary team shall review child sexual abuse cases and child
human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity referred by
participating professionals, including those in which the alleged perpetrator
does not have custodial control or supervision of the child or is not
responsible for the child's welfare. The purpose of the multidisciplinary team
shall be to review investigations, assess service delivery, and to facilitate
efficient and appropriate disposition of cases through the criminal justice
system.
(d) The team shall hold regularly scheduled meetings if new reports of sexual
abuse or child human trafficking cases involving commercial sexual activity
are received or if active cases exist. At each meeting, each active case shall be
presented and the agencies' responses assessed.
(e) The multidisciplinary team shall provide an annual report to the public of
nonidentifying case information to allow assessment of the processing and
disposition of child sexual abuse cases and child human trafficking cases
involving commercial sexual activity.
(f) Multidisciplinary team members and anyone invited by the multidisciplinary
team to participate in a meeting shall not divulge case information, including
information regarding the identity of the victim or source of the report. Team
members and others attending meetings shall sign a confidentiality statement
that is consistent with statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.
(g) The multidisciplinary team shall, pursuant to KRS 431.600 and 431.660,
develop a local protocol consistent with the model protocol issued by the
Page 23 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
Kentucky Multidisciplinary Commission on Child Sexual Abuse. The local
team shall submit the protocol to the commission for review and approval.
(h) The multidisciplinary team review of a case may include information from
reports generated by agencies, organizations, or individuals that are
responsible for investigation, prosecution, or treatment in the case, KRS
610.320 to KRS 610.340 notwithstanding.
(i) To the extent practicable, multidisciplinary teams shall be staffed by the local
children's advocacy center.
(9) Nothing in this section shall limit the cabinet's investigatory authority under KRS
620.050 or any other obligation imposed by law.
Section 4. KRS 620.048 is amended to read as follows:
(1) During a child protective services investigation conducted pursuant to the authority
in this chapter where there is a safety plan negotiated and agreed upon between
the cabinet and the parent, guardian, person in a position of authority or special
trust, as defined in KRS 532.045, or other person having custodial control or
supervision of the child or responsibility for his or her welfare that the child
cannot safely remain in the home[a child is placed outside of his or her home on a
safety plan], the cabinet shall file a petition in court within seventy-two (72) hours
if the child remains placed outside of his or her home for more than fourteen (14)
consecutive days.
(2) All safety plans implemented pursuant to this section shall be compiled by the
cabinet on a quarterly basis into a report containing at a minimum the total number
of safety plans, the outcome of the safety plans, and the number of court petitions
filed.
(3) By December 1, 2024, and quarterly thereafter, the cabinet shall make available, on
its website and to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee, Senate Standing Committee, and House Standing Committee on
Page 24 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
Families and Children, the report on safety plans established in subsection (2) of
this section.
Section 5. KRS 605.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet is authorized to expend available funds to provide for the board,
lodging, and care of children who would otherwise be placed in foster care or who
are placed by the cabinet in a foster home or boarding home, or may arrange for
payments or contributions by any local governmental unit, or public or private
agency or organization, willing to make payments or contributions for such
purpose. The cabinet may accept any gift, devise, or bequest made to it for its
purposes.
(2) The cabinet shall establish a reimbursement system, within existing appropriation
amounts, for foster parents that comes as close as possible to meeting the actual
cost of caring for foster children. The cabinet shall consider providing additional
reimbursement for foster parents who obtain additional training, and foster parents
who have served for an extended period of time. In establishing a reimbursement
system, the cabinet shall, to the extent possible within existing appropriation
amounts, address the additional cost associated with providing care to children with
exceptional needs.
(3) The cabinet shall review reimbursement rates paid to foster parents and shall issue a
report upon request comparing the rates paid by Kentucky to the figures presented
in the Expenditures on Children by Families Annual Report prepared by the United
States Department of Agriculture and the rates paid to foster parents by other states.
To the extent that funding is available, reimbursement rates paid to foster parents
shall be increased on an annual basis to reflect cost of living increases.
(4) The cabinet is encouraged to develop pilot projects both within the state system and
in collaboration with private child caring agencies to test alternative delivery
systems and nontraditional funding mechanisms.
Page 25 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 805/GA
(5) (a) The cabinet shall track and analyze data on relative and fictive kin caregiver
placements. The data shall include but not be limited to:
1. Demographic data on relative and fictive kin caregivers and children in
their care;
2. Custodial options selected by the relative and fictive kin caregivers;
3. Services provisioned to relative and fictive kin caregivers and children
in their care; and
4. Permanency benchmarks and outcomes for relative and fictive kin
caregiver placements.
(b) By September 30, 2020, and annually[upon request] thereafter, the cabinet
shall submit a report to the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court,
and the director of the Legislative Research Commission for automatic
distribution to the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children relating
to the data tracking and analysis established in this subsection and post the
report to the cabinet website for public view no later than February 28 of
the following year.
(6) Foster parents shall have the authority, unless the cabinet determines that the child's
religion, race, ethnicity, or national origin prevents it, to make decisions regarding
haircuts and hairstyles for foster children who are in their care for thirty (30) days
or more.
Page 26 of 26
HB080510.100 - 1842 - XXXX 3/6/2025 4:12 PM GA